patterns/dehyphn-x-fugen-2019-11-19.pattern
wach3si
wach8stub
wacht4r
4wachu
wach1w
wach1z
wachzu5h
waffel3
1wage
2wags
2wagt
wahl5ent
wahl1i
1wahn
2wak
wal1a
wal2bu
wal2c
wald3a
wal2m1
wals2
wal2t
walt3a
walter6
walt2s
wam2
wamen2
2wana1
wan3b
wand3a
2wang4
wangs6we
wan3h
2wank
wanz5end
wa2r2
ware1i
3wareke
ware1l
waren1
war3l
wart4e
2wart2s
war3u
was2
wasch3l
wasi1
wass4
wasse4
w2ä
4wält
2wäng
wär2
wäss4
2w3äu
w1b
w2boy
w1c
w1do
we2
2we.
web1a
4webeb
webe1d
webe1i
weber3h
web1l
web1r
web1s
web3z
weed3
1weg.
3wegef
weg1ei
wege1l
weger2
weg5ersc
3wegfl
3weggl
weg3lei
3wego
weg1or
wegs2a
wegs2t
weg4ste
weg3stü
2wegu
weh1l
weh1m
wehr3er4
weib2
wei3ba
wei1br
wei1dr
2weie
wei2er
2weig
weige3p
wei2gr
weik2
wei1mi
wei2n
wein3b
wein1f
wein3g
wein3h
wein3k
wein3l
wein3r
weins3a
wein3sc
wein3so
wein3st
wein1v
wein3w
wei1p
wei1r
wei1sc
4weisem
3weish
weiss3p
wei1st
wei1ta
6weiteru
weit1r
weit1s
wel2
wel3b
welk2
well4s
welt1
welt3a
we3me
we3mo
wen3a
wen2d
wen2i
wenk1a
wenk3ri
wen1s
2wer1a
wer2b
werbe3a
werbe3d
werbe3f
werbe3i
werbe5mi
werbe7ric
werbe3s
werbe3t
wer4bu
wer2d2
werde3i
5werdens
1werdu
wer1fa
wer1fä
wer1fi
wer1fr
2werfu
2werg
wer1gä
werg1o
wer1h
wer1i
werk1a
wer1kr
werk3re
wer1la
wer1m
wern4h
wer3pa
wer1r
2wers
wer1sp
wer2t
wert1a
wer4te
wert3ei
wert5erm
wert1o
wer3tra
wert3ri
wer3tut
wer1w
wer3wö
we4s2
wese2
wesens3
weser1
wes4t
west3a
west3ec
west3ei
west5end
west1o
west1r
2wete
2weto
2wets
wett1l
wett1s
2wetz
2we3u
2we3v
2wey
w1g
w3ho
w2i
wib1
wicht4s
wid2
wider4s
1widr
2wie2b
wieder4
wie1m
wie2n
wien2e
wien1t
wie2s
4wig
wig1g
wig2s
wik2
wil2
2wil.
will4
willen4
wimm1u
win2
2win.
wina1
wind3ec
wind5erz
1wind1r
wind3sc
2wing
wing1r
2wini
winn7er8sc
2wins
winter5f
winter5p
winter5r
wire1
wis4
wisch3l
wissen6s
wiss6z
2wist
wit2
2witzd
w1k
2wl
w1m
wn2b
wns2a
wn1sh
wo2a
2wob
1woc
woch3a
woch3m
woch3si
wod2
wo2f
2wog
woh2
wo1he
1wolf
wolf2s1
woll3b
woll5er
wo1mi
wo1mö
won2
wo1na
wor3a
2worb
woren2
wor3i
1work
wor1na
wort1a
wort3bi
wort3g
wort1r
wort3s
wor3u
wor1ü
2wos
wo2z
1wöc
wöl4
wölbe3s
wör2
2w1p
w1ro
4ws
ws2e
wser1
w1s2h
ws2k
ws1s
wsser2
w1sti
2wt
w1ta
w1term
w1ti
w3tons.
w1tr
wu2
wuch4
w1uf
wul2
wul3se
wund4e
wung1r
wung3s
wunsch7la
wur2
4wur.
wurf1o
wur3g
1wurm
wurs2
3wut1
1wüc
wül2
wür2
2würg
wüte4
2w1z
x1ab
x1aff
x1all
x3ann
x2ant
x2anz
x1ap
x1arb
x1b
x2bu
x2bü
x1ca
x1cl
x1co
x1d
x2du
xe2
x1ele
xel1t
xem1b
x2en
xen1k
xen3s2
xen1t
xer1a
x1erl
xers2
x1eu
x1ex
x1f
x2fr
x1g
x2ga
xgau1
x2gl
x2go
x1ha
x1hä
x1he
xi1c
xid1em
x1ido
xid3s
xie1l
xi1f
xi1g
xil1l
xil3u
xim2
xin3b
xin1s2
xi1p
xi1r
xis1e
xis1o
xis3s
xi1stä
xi1ze
x1ja
x1ka
xkal2
x1kä
x1ki
x1kon
x4kö
xl2
x1lä
x1me
x1mo
x1n
xo1di
x1oe
x1org
x1ö
x1par
x2po
xport3r
x1pu
x1ri
x1s2
xt1a
xt2ane
xt2ant
xt1ä
x1tät
xt3b
xt1ed
x1teil
xt1ein
xt1el
xt1erf
x1term
xt1ev
xt1h
xt1ill
xt3lin
xt1o
xt1ran
xt1rec
xt1s2
xt1t
xt1um
xt1un
xt1w
xt1z
x1un
xus3
xuss2
x1ve
x1vo
x1w
x3wer
xy2
x1za
x1zei
x1zi
x1zo
x1zu
y1ab
1yac
ya1g
yage2
ya1la
yan3ka
ya1ra
yat2
y1b
yber4
yd2
y1dec
yde1p
y1do
ydrid1
yeder3
ye1f
y1ei
y2el
yen2
y2er
yern1
yes2
ye1sp
y1f
yg2
y1gä
y1ge
y1gr
y1gu
y1h
y3ho
yk2
y1ki
ykol3
y1kü
yl1ac
yl1am
yl4ante
yl4anti
yl1b
yl1c
yl1d
yl1em
yl1es
yl1et
yl2lo
yl1m
y2lo
yloid1
yl1ora
y1lö
yl1s
yl2t
y1ma
ym2e
ym2n
yn2
y2ne
yn3h
ynk2
y1nu
yoga1
yom2
yo1s
y1ou
yo1z
2yp
yp1ab
yp1an
y2pä
yp2e
ypen3
yper2
yp1f
yp1id
yp1in
yp1l
y2po
yp1p
yp1th
yp1um
yr2
y1rau
y1rei
y3rig
yros3
yrr2
yr3s
ys4
y1sä
yse1
yse2r
y1sh
y2sl
y1spa
y1spi
yst2e
ysten1
yst2h
y1sz
yt2h
yt1l
yto2
yt1r
yur2
y1v
y2vi
y1w
yz2
yzer2
y2zy
2za.
2z1ab
za1bä
1zac
2zach
z1achs
zack3l
2z1ad
z1af
zag2
z3ak
za1kar
2z1al
2z1am
z1an4
2zana
2zane
2zangs
z2ank
2zanl
2zant
za2p
z1aq
z3arb
za1res
z1arm
z2aro
2z1as4
zast2
2z1at2
za1te
za1ti
za2u2
2z1auf
z3aug
z3aur
2zaus4
z1aut
2za1v
z3äc
z2äh
1zähn
z1äm
2z1än
z1äp
2z1är
z1äus
z1äuß
2z1b2
z2ba
z3bac
z3bad
z3bal
z3ban
z3bas
z3bau
z3be
z2bol
z1ca
z1cha
z1chi
z1cho
z1cl
z1co
2z1d2
4ze.
ze1ad
ze1am
zean3f
ze1au
ze1b
z1eben
2z1echo
ze1e2
ze1f
z1eff
ze1g
z1ega
1zeh
ze1ha
3zehe
zehen1
2zehr
zei1b
zei1d
zei1f
zei2g
zeige3g
zeige3p
zeige3t
zei3gr
zei3k2
1zeil2
zei1la
zei1m
4z1ein2
z2e1ind
ze3inse
zei1p
zei1r
zei1s4
zeiss2
zeist4
zeiß2
1zeit
zeit1a
zeit3d
zeit3er4
zeit1r
zeit3so
zeit3sp
3zeitu
zei1z
ze3k
2zel.
zel1a
zel1ä
zel1d
2zele
z1elek
zel1er
zel3f
zel3ha
zel1in
z1elit
zel1k
zel2la
zell3ac
zel3lau
3zeller
zell5ert
3zellig
zell1s
zel1m4
zel1o
2zels2
zel3sp
zel1sz
zel1tr
zem2
zember3
ze1mi
2z1emp
2zen.
2zena
zen3ac
zen3au
zen3b
2zend
zend4m
2zene
zene1t
z3enge.
z4en3gl
zen3he
zen3k
zen1o
zen3sat
zen1st
zen3tal
zen3tei
zen3the
zen3tis
z2entn
zent5rec
zent3sa
zent3se
zent3sk
zent3sp
zent3we
4zenz
zenz3er
ze1o
2zep
ze1pa
ze1pe
ze1pl
ze1po
ze1pr
2zer.
zer1a
zeran4
zer1ba
z2ere
zer3eig
zer3ein
ze1rek
zer1er
zer3flu
zer3fra
zer3füh
z3erfül
z1ergä
z3ergeb
zer3gel
zer3ger
zer3gol
z1ergu
zer3han
z2er1he
z3erhö
2zeri
zerk2
zer1ke
z2erko
zer3lis
zer1mi
zer4mit
2z2er2n
zer3nam
zern3eb
zern3ei
zer1o
z1erö
zer2p
zer3pr
z1erq
z3erreg
zer3rel
zer2s
z1ersa
2zersd
zer3spe
zer5stei
zer3sz
zert3ag
zert4an
zert1l
z5ertrag
zert5rau
zer1wa
zer3wäl
z1erwe
zer4wei
zer3wes
zer1wi
z1erz
2zes
ze1sam
ze1sc
zes1e
zeser2
zes1p
ze1spi
zes2s
zess5end
zess1t
ze1sta
zest1h
ze3stra
ze1su
2zet.
z1eth
zeu2
5zeug.
zeug1r
z1eul
2ze1ur
2zeut
ze1v
ze1w
z1ex
ze1z
z1f
z3fa
z3fe
z3fl
z1g2
zgang3
z5gerinn
z3gern
zger2s1
4z1h
z3hel
z3her
zich2
zid1r
zie2
1zieg
1ziel.
ziel1i
2ziell
2zien
zie3sc
2zig
zig4e
zi1go
zi1gr
zig2s
zi3h
zil2
zi1la
1zim2
2z1imp
zimt1
zin3b
2z1ind
zin1dä
zin2e
zin3ei
zinein4
z1inf
zin3fas
zin1fl
4zing
zin3ges
z1inh
zin1in
z1inj
zin5steu
zin1ta
z1inv
zin3ver
zi2p
zi1re
zirk2
zirr2
2zis4
z1iso
ziss4
zi1sz
2zit.
zite2
zit1o
zium1
ziv2
zi1z
z1j
2z1k2
z3ko
2zl
z1la
z2lar
z2laus
z1lä
z1leb
z1led
z1leg
z1leh
z1leis
zlei3ti
zler2s
zle1st
zle1t
z3licht
z1lie
z1lin
zli1p
z1lis
z1lit
z1loc
z1lö
z1luf
z1lü
2z1m
zmon2
z3mu
z1n2
z2ne
znei1
z3nel
z3neu
2zo.
z1oas
z1ob
2zod
z1of
zo1fo
2zog2
zogs1
2z1oh
zo1ha
zo1k
2zol.
2zola
2zole
zoll3be
zoll5ert
zoll3k
zom2
zo1ma
2zona
zonal2
zon1au
zon1l
zon3s
zont3er
2zonu
1zoo
zoo1f
zoo1t
zoo1v
z1ope
zo3pi
zo1pl
z1or
3z2orn
zorn1e
4zo1s4
zo3so
zo3su
z1osz
z1ou
z1öf
z1ök
z1öl
z2öll
4zön
2z1p
z3pr
2z1q
z1r
z1s2
z3str
2zt
z1ta2
zt1ane
z2t1au
z1tä
z1tec
z3tee
zte1g
z1tei
zt3eins
z1t2el
ztem2
zt1ent
zte1o
zter2
z1term
zt1erz
z1teu
z1them
z1ther
zt1hi
zt1ho
z1thr
z1thy
z2tin
zt2ma
z1to
zton1
z1tö
z1tr
zt1rec
zt3s2
zt1t
z1tu
z1tü
zt1w
zt1z
2zu.
4zuag
zu1an
zu2ba
zu4bah
zu2beh
zu2bo
zu2c
1zuch2
2zud4
zude2
zu2deu
3zu1du
zu2ei
zu2em
zuen2
zuer2
zu1erf
zu1erh
zu2ex
2zufe
zu2fol
zu4fors
zu2fr
1zu2fu
zug1g
zu2gl
zug3lic
zug1n
zu3gos
zu2gr
2zugsg
4zugss
2zugsz
zu2gu
zug3un
zu2han
zu2hau
zu2her
zu2hö
2z1uhr
1zuhu
2zu2j
zu4käu
3zuke
zu2ken
2zukr
zu1kra
zul2
zu2lag
zu3ler
zum2
z3um.
2z1umb
zu1men2
z1umf
z1umg
z1uml
2zu2mo
2z1umr
z1ums
zu2mü
2z1unem
3zunf
zung2
z3ungl
zungs8wei
z1uni
z1unr
z1uns
z1unt
zu2o
zu2p
3zu3pi
zu1pre
3zuq
zur2a
zu2rat
4zu2rä
2zuri
2z1urk
2z1url
2z1urn
2z1urs
z1urt
zur1z
zus4
zu2sa
zusch4
zu4schm
zu4sie
zu2sp
zu3spä
zu2stä
zu2sti
zu2stu
zut4
zu2ta
zu2te
zu3tel
1zuto
zu3tor
zu2u
zu2we
zu2wi
zu2wo
zu2zäu
zu2ze
3zuzö
zu2zw
2z1üb
2z1v
z1wac
z1wag
z1wah
z1wal
zwander6
2z1war
z1was
z1wäl
z1wäs
z1wech
z1wed
z1weg
zweg1s
z1weh
z1weil
z3weis.
1zweit
z1wel
z1wen
z1wer4
z1wes
z1wet
z2wic
z1wild
z1wir
2z3wiss
z2wit
z1wo
z1wör
2zwu
z1wur
2z1wü
1zy
2zy.
3zya
zyan1
3zyklu
3zyl
4zylb
4zyle
zym1
2zz
zz2a
zza3b
zza1d
zz3al
zza1m
z1zä
zz3b
z1ze
z3zei
z3zet
zz1id
zz1ini
zzi1s
z1z2ö
z1zu
zzug2s1
z1zü
z1zw
z1zw
 end of preamble 
 -->
<HyphenationDescription>
</HyphenationDescription>
